Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF593.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. Section 468.27, Code 2025, is amended by adding the following new subsection: NEW SUBSECTION . 3. a. When the county auditor first receives either the survey and report, or a permanent survey, plat, and profile, as provided in subsection 2, the county auditor shall prepare and file with the county recorder a district parcel record that identifies all parcels contained within the district that is part of the county. The parcel record filed by the county auditor with the county recorder must also include the legal description, parcel identification number, if known, and names of the owners as shown in transfer books in the office of the auditor, for each forty-acre tract or fraction thereof. The county auditor shall provide the county recorder with any amendment to the district parcel record within a reasonable period after receiving the amendment. A county shall not charge a district a filing fee or any other cost or expense under this subsection, including an expense described in section 468.154. b. (1) A county auditor who has not filed a document described in paragraph âaâ as a district parcel record with the county recorder before the effective date of this Act shall Senate File 593, p. 2 prepare and file the district parcel record on or before June 30, 2026. (2) This paragraph âbâ is repealed July 1, 2026. ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House I hereby certify that this bill originated in the Senate and is known as Senate File 593, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ W. CHARLES SMITHSON Secretary of the Senate Approved _______________, 2025 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor